Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 4A. National Guard

§ 2856. Section 2856 repealed effective July 1, 2022. Educational assistance; interest free loans.

An active member of the Vermont National Guard may be eligible for an interest-free loan in an academic year for financial assistance to pay for tuition and fees for courses taken at a Vermont college, university, regional technical center, or other programs approved pursuant to policies adopted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section.

To be eligible for an educational loan under this section, a person shall:

be an active member in good standing of a federally recognized unit of the Vermont National Guard;

have successfully completed basic training or commissioning; and

be enrolled in a program that leads to a postsecondary degree, diploma or be studying for relevant continuing education purposes.

A loan made under this section shall be interest free and may be partially or completely cancelled and forgiven for a person who:

submits certification that the person has successfully completed the course; and

submits certification that the person has completed two years of National Guard service for each full academic year award. Service requirements for less than a full academic year award shall be proportionate to the amount of the award. The Board shall determine the amount of loan to be cancelled for each completed year of service. The amount cancelled for each year of service shall not exceed 50 percent of the loan.

The Adjutant General shall provide documentation of eligibility for educational assistance under this section for each academic period.

The loan of a person who loses eligibility under this section while enrolled in a course shall go into repayment pursuant to the terms of the loan, and the person shall be ineligible for further assistance under this section until the loan is repaid in full.

The Board, in consultation with the Office of the Adjutant General, shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary to implement the provisions of this section, which shall include application requirements, annual loan requirements, loan forgiveness requirements, and annual loan amounts based on available funds. The policies, procedures, and guidelines shall include definitions of “successful completion of a course,” “relevant continuing education courses,” and what constitutes an “academic year.” Rules adopted by the Vermont State Colleges under section 2183 of this title, prior to its repeal, shall remain valid under this section and shall be administered by the Corporation.

[Repealed.]

The availability of loans made under this subchapter is subject to funds appropriated to the Vermont National Guard for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 62

, § 61; amended

2003, No. 39

, § 1;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2007, No. 46

, § 5, eff. May 23, 2007;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 4

, § 86, eff. April 24, 2009;

2011, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; repealed on July 1, 2022 by

2018, No. 11

(Sp. Sess.), § E.215.2.

§ 2857.
Vermont National Guard Tuition Benefit Program.

Program creation. The Vermont National Guard Tuition Benefit Program (Program) is created, under which a member of the Vermont National Guard (member) who meets the eligibility requirements in subsection (c) of this section is entitled to the following tuition benefit for up to full-time attendance:

For courses at either campus of the Northern Vermont University (NVU), the Vermont Technical College (VTC), the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College (UVM), or at the Community College of Vermont (CCV), the benefit shall be the in-state residence tuition rate for the relevant institution.

For courses at a Vermont State College, other than NVU, VTC, or CCV, or at any eligible Vermont private postsecondary institution, the benefit shall be the in-state tuition rate charged by NVU.

For courses at an eligible training institution offering nondegree, certificate training, or continuing education programs, the benefit shall be the lower of the institution’s standard tuition or the in-state tuition rate charged by NVU.

Tuition benefit. The tuition benefit provided under the Program shall be paid on behalf of the member by the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation (VSAC), subject to the appropriation of funds by the General Assembly specifically for this purpose. An eligible Vermont postsecondary institution that accepts or receives the tuition benefit on behalf of a member shall charge the member the tuition rate for an in-state student. The amount of tuition for a member who attends an educational institution under the Program on less than a full-time basis shall be reduced to reflect the member’s course load in a manner determined by VSAC under subdivision (f)(1) of this section. The tuition benefit shall be conditioned upon the member’s executing a promissory note obligating the member to repay the member’s tuition benefit, in whole or in part, if the member fails to complete the period of Vermont National Guard service required in subsection (d) of this section, or if the member’s benefit is terminated pursuant to subdivision (e)(1) of this section.

Eligibility. To be eligible for the Program, an individual, whether a resident or nonresident, shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

be an active member of the Vermont National Guard;

have successfully completed basic training;

be enrolled at UVM, a Vermont State College, or any other college or university located in Vermont in a program that leads to an undergraduate certificate or degree or at an eligible training institution in a program that leads to a certificate or other credential recognized by VSAC;

have not previously earned an undergraduate bachelor’s degree;

continually demonstrate satisfactory academic progress as determined by criteria established by the Vermont National Guard and VSAC, in consultation with the educational institution at which the individual is enrolled under the Program;

have used available post-September 11, 2001 tuition benefits and other federally funded military tuition assistance; provided, however, that this subdivision shall not apply to:

tuition benefits and other federally funded military tuition assistance for which the individual has not yet earned the full amount of the benefit or tuition;

Montgomery GI Bill benefits;

post-September 11, 2001 educational program housing allowances;

federal educational entitlements;

National Guard scholarship grants;

loans under section 2856 of this title; and

other nontuition benefits; and

have submitted a statement of good standing to VSAC signed by the individual’s commanding officer within 30 days prior to the beginning of each semester.

Service commitment.

For each full academic year of attendance under the Program, a member shall be required to serve two years in the Vermont National Guard in order to receive the full tuition benefit under the Program.

If a member’s service with the Vermont National Guard terminates before the member fulfills this two-year service commitment, other than for good cause as determined by the Vermont National Guard, the individual shall reimburse VSAC a pro rata portion of the tuition paid under the Program pursuant to the terms of an interest-free reimbursement promissory note signed by the individual at the time of entering the Program.

For members participating in the Program on a less than full-time basis, the member’s service commitment shall be at the rate of one month of Vermont National Guard service commitment for each credit hour, not to exceed 12 months of service commitment for a single semester.

Termination of tuition benefit.

The Office of the Vermont Adjutant and Inspector General may terminate the tuition benefit provided an individual under the Program if:

the individual’s commanding officer revokes the statement of good standing submitted pursuant to subdivision (c)(7) of this section as a result of an investigation or disciplinary action that occurred after the statement of good standing was issued;

the individual is dismissed from the educational institution in which the individual is enrolled under the Program for academic or disciplinary reasons; or

the individual withdraws without good cause from the educational institution in which the individual is enrolled under the Program.

If an individual’s tuition benefit is terminated pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the individual shall reimburse VSAC for the tuition paid under the Program, pursuant to the terms of an interest-free reimbursement promissory note signed by the individual at the time of entering the Program; shall be responsible on a pro rata basis for the remaining tuition cost for the current semester or any courses in which the individual is currently enrolled; and shall be ineligible to receive future tuition benefits under the Program.

If an individual is dismissed for academic or disciplinary reasons from any postsecondary educational institution before receiving tuition benefits under the Program, the Office of the Adjutant and Inspector General may make a determination regarding the individual’s eligibility to receive tuition benefits under the Program.

Adoption of policies, procedures, and guidelines.

VSAC, in consultation with the Office of the Adjutant and Inspector General, shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary to implement the provisions of this section, which shall include eligibility, application, and acceptance requirements, proration of service requirements for academic semesters or attendance periods shorter than one year, data sharing guidelines, and the criteria for determining “good cause” as used in subdivisions (d)(2) and (e)(1)(C) of this section.

Each educational institution participating in the Program shall adopt policies and procedures for the enrollment of members under the Program. These policies and procedures shall be consistent with the policies, procedures, and guidelines adopted by VSAC under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Reports.

On or before November 1 of each year, the President, Chancellor, or equivalent position of each educational institution that participated in the Program during the immediately preceding school year shall report to the Vermont National Guard and VSAC regarding the number of members enrolled at its institution during that school year who received tuition benefits under the Program and, to the extent available, the courses or program in which the members were enrolled.

On or before January 15 of each year, the Vermont National Guard and VSAC shall report these data and other relevant performance factors, including information pertaining to the achievement of the goals of this entitlement program and the costs of the Program to date, to the Governor, the House and Senate Committees on Education, and the House Committees on Appropriations and on General, Housing, and Military Affairs. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

, expiration of reports, shall not apply to the reports to be made under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2018, No. 11

(Sp. Sess.), § E.215.1; amended

2019, No. 6

, § 85, eff. April 22, 2019;

2019, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. March 4, 2020.